Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202664-408
Types of online notarial acts.

The following types of online notarial acts may be performed by an online notary public:

(1) Acknowledgments;

(2) Jurats;

(3) Verifications or proofs; and

(4) Oaths or affirmations.

Laws 2019, LB186, § 8.